Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7878.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 39-33-1, 39-33-2 and 39-33-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 39-
33 entitled "Energy Storage Systems Act" are hereby amended to read as follows:
39-33-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Constrained feeder" means a distribution feeder owned and/or operated by an electric
distribution company as defined in § 39-1-2 which feeder is eighty percent (80%) or higher load
constrained.
(2) “Commission” means the public utilities commission.
(2)(3) “Energy storage system” means any technology capable of converting electrical
energy to some form of stored energy for reconversion to electrical energy at a later time.
(3)(4) “Long-duration energy storage system” means energy storage systems that are
capable of permanently displacing fossil fuel energy systems designed to store energy or necessary
for balancing intermittent renewable energy resources.
39-33-2. Storage tariff.
(a) No later than September 1, 2024, the public utilities commission shall engage
stakeholders to adopt a framework for an energy storage system tariff for energy storage systems
connected to the electric distribution system.
(1) The tariff framework should, at a minimum, address the ability of energy storage

systems to charge from and discharge to the electric distribution system.
(2) The commission shall set a schedule that is designed to result in a model tariff no later
than May 1, 2025, consistent with the tariff framework.
(3) Following that date, if the commission finds that the energy storage system tariff can
be implemented without inequitable cross subsidization between customers, each electric
distribution company as defined in § 39-1-2 that has greater than one hundred thousand (100,000)
customers shall file the model tariff for review and approval by the public utilities commission in
a contested proceeding. Otherwise, the model tariff shall be included as part of the electric
distribution company’s next general rate filing.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, no later than September 30, 2026, each
electric distribution company as defined in § 39-1-2 that has greater than one hundred thousand
(100,000) customers shall file an energy storage system tariff for review and approval by the
commission in a contested proceeding which tariff shall contain the following provisions:
(1) The owner/operator of an energy storage system shall be compensated one hundred and
eighty-five dollars per nameplate kilowatt capacity ($185/kW) per year for a system no greater than
five megawatts (5 MW) in size and connected to a constrained feeder. This tariff shall be effective
until one hundred megawatts (100 MW) of energy storage systems have been connected to
constrained feeders at which point the commission may extend the tariff, revise the tariff or
discontinue the tariff. The tariff shall provide for this compensation for ten (10) years following the
energy storage system’s receipt of authorization to interconnect.
(2) The tariff may require that the energy storage system discharge at certain times during
the day and at certain times during the year to maximize the benefits to the grid. The tariff may not
require systems to discharge more than seventy (70) times per year. The owners/operators of the
energy storage system shall pay the G-32 rate (or, if the G-32 rate is discontinued, the most
comparable rate class then existing) when charging. The tariff may provide for financial penalties
for energy storage systems failing to comply with the discharging requirements.
(3) The tariff shall provide that the determination of whether an energy storage system is
proposed to be connected to a constrained feeder shall be made when the owner/operator of the
energy storage system files its interconnection application with the electric distribution company
and the energy storage system shall not lose eligibility for this tariff program following the
eligibility determination and for ten (10) years after the receipt of authorization to interconnect.
(4) The tariff shall provide for the execution of a contract between the owner/operator of
the energy storage system and the electric distribution company reflecting the operational and
compensation terms of the energy storage system.
LC005687 - Page 2 of 4

(5) The tariff may contain any other provisions which are reasonable and necessary to
facilitate a tariff program on the terms set forth in subsections (2)(b)(1) through (2)(b)(4) of this
section.
39-33-3. Interconnection.
(a) No later than September 1, 2024, the commission shall commence a process, which
includes stakeholder engagement, to adopt a framework for an interconnection tariff for energy
storage systems connected to the electric distribution system that recognizes the flexible operating
characteristics of energy storage systems.
(b) Following the public utilities commission’s adoption of a framework, which shall be
completed no later than May 1, 2025, each electric distribution company as defined in § 39-1-2 that
has greater than one hundred thousand (100,000) customers shall file a proposed energy storage
system interconnection tariff for review and approval in a contested proceeding.
No later than September 30, 2026, each electric distribution company as defined in § 39-
1-2 that has greater than one hundred thousand (100,000) customers shall file a proposed energy
storage system interconnection tariff for review and approval by the commission in a contested
proceeding. The tariff shall regulate the interconnection of energy storage systems in a manner
commensurate with the manner in which the Narragansett Electric Company Standards for
Connecting Distributed Generation (R.I.P.U.C. No. 2258) regulates distributed generation. The
tariff may contain provisions which are reasonable and necessary to regulate interconnection of
energy storage systems and, more specifically, the tariff may address concepts such as
import/export capacity and operating profiles and schedules.
SECTION 2. Chapter 39-33 of the General Laws entitled "Energy Storage Systems Act" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-33-6. Legislative purpose.
The purpose of this chapter is to facilitate and promote the installation of energy storage
systems in the State of Rhode Island. Energy storage systems are capable of delivering significant
benefits to the electric power system. Energy storage systems can reduce the market price for
electricity, improve power quality by charging and discharging as needed, avoid the need for new
capacity investments, and supply backup power during grid outages.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005687
========
LC005687 - Page 3 of 4